Hawaii statutes.
§328-21 Rules and regulations, hearings.
(a) Subject to chapter 91 the director of health may adopt and enforce such
rules or regulations as the director may deem necessary for the efficient
enforcement of this part. The director may make the rules or regulations
prescribed under this part conform insofar as practicable with those
promulgated under the Federal Act.

(b) Hearings authorized or required by this
part shall be conducted by the director or any officer, agent, or employee
designated by the director for that purpose and shall be subject to chapter 91.
[L 1941, c 318, §16; RL 1945, §2220; RL 1955, §51-20; am L 1965, c 96, §37; HRS
§328-21; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next